Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-170
Pierce.

The county of Pierce is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-five, north, of range four, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-five, north, of range one, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-eight, north, of range one, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-eight, north, of range four, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 41, p. 220;

R.S.1913, § 885;

C.S.1922, § 787;

C.S.1929, § 25-174;

R.S.1943, § 22-170.